District of Columbia statutes.
8-1403

Hazardous Materials Transportation Program.

The Mayor shall establish a Hazardous Materials Transportation Program that shall include at a minimum:

(1)

A description of the criteria for determining what materials constitute hazardous materials that is consistent with the federal hazardous materials transportation regulations of the United States Department of Transportation;

(2)

The identification of the types and quantities of hazardous materials transported in the District;

(3)

The identification of the carriers and shippers of the hazardous materials;

(4)

A designation of primary and alternate routes for the transportation of hazardous materials in the District consistent with the federal hazardous materials transportation regulations and the federal motor carrier safety regulations of the United States Department of Transportation and taking into consideration factors that will ensure the highest degree of safety to individuals and property, including the following:

(A)

Population density along the primary and alternate routes;

(B)

Traffic and street conditions, including dimensions of streets and alleys;

(C)

The ability to evacuate individuals in the vicinity of the primary and alternate routes should evacuation become necessary;

(D)

The type and quantity of hazardous materials being transported;

(E)

Whether the hazardous materials are route-controlled quantities of radioactive materials consistent with the federal hazardous materials transportation regulations; and

(F)

Consistency, to the extent practicable, with the laws and regulations of adjacent states and local jurisdictions likely to be affected by the route selections;

(5)

A system governing the transportation, packaging, labelling, and placarding of hazardous materials transported in the District consistent with the federal hazardous materials transportation regulations;

(6)

A system to ensure motor carrier safety consistent with the federal motor carrier safety regulations that will qualify the District for federal grant assistance to implement this chapter;

(7)

The inspection of commercial motor vehicles, including vehicles that transport hazardous materials in the District consistent with the federal hazardous materials transportation regulations and federal motor safety carrier regulations;

(8)

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-190, § 4, 35 DCR 8663
Oct. 1, 1992, D.C. Law 9-173, § 3(a), 39 DCR 5834
1981 Ed., § 6-3303.